Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 13 Explosives and Fireworks

11-13-1.
Sale, use or possession of fireworks.

No person shall offer for sale at retail or at wholesale, shall possess or have under his or her control, use or explode, or cause to explode for exhibition or amusement, display fireworks or aerial consumer fireworks unless permits are obtained pursuant to this chapter and chapter 23-28.11. Display fireworks are defined in the American pyrotechnic association standard 87-1 (APA 87-1) 2001 Edition section 2.7.2 and are classified as explosives 1.3G by the U.S. department of transportation (U.S. DOT), UN0335. Aerial consumer fireworks are defined in APA 87-1 2001 Edition section 3.1.2. and are classified 1.4G U.S. DOT, UN 0336. Certain fireworks and devices that are exempt from the definitions of display fireworks and aerial consumer fireworks shall include, but are not limited to, the following: ground-based and hand-held sparkling devices (non-aerial fireworks) as defined in APA 87-1 2001 Edition sections 3.1.1 and 3.5, and include the following: fountains, illuminating torches, wheels, ground spinners, flitter sparklers, sparkers; novelties, which are defined in the APA 87-1 2001 Edition section 3.2 and include the following: party poppers, snappers, toy smoke devices, snakes, glow worms, wire sparklers and dipped sticks; paper caps containing not more than twenty-five hundredths (0.025) grains of explosive mixture ammunition to be consumed by weapons used for sporting and hunting purposes, and model rockets and model rocket engines, designed, sold and used for the purpose of propelling recoverable aero models). The storage, possession, sale, transportation and use of the items in the above reference section that are not included in the definition of display fireworks and aerial consumer fireworks shall be allowed at all times throughout the state for persons at least sixteen (16) years of age. Permits for display fireworks and aerial consumer fireworks for commercial display may be issued in accordance with provisions of the Rhode Island Fire Safety Code, chapters 28.1 — 28.39 of title 23. Fireworks display of display and aerial consumer fireworks by any municipality, fair association, amusement park, or other organization or group of individuals is permitted, on condition that the display shall be made by a competent operator approved by the local fire authority and shall be of such character as in the opinion of the fire authority will not be hazardous to persons or property; and, provided further, that the foregoing shall not apply the use of display and aerial consumer fireworks by common carriers for signal or illumination purposes, the use of blank cartridges in any show or theater, the use of explosives for blasting, the use of display and aerial consumer fireworks as signals in any athletic or sporting event, the use of display and aerial consumer fireworks for ceremonial or military purposes, the sale of fireworks for shipment out of this state, or the sale of fireworks for any use permitted pursuant to this section, provided the person who sells, stores or transports display and aerial consumer fireworks has a permit as required by the Rhode Island Fire Safety Code, chapters 28.1 — 28.39 of title 23.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a felony and shall be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense and/or imprisoned for not more than one year for each offense; except that any person using or having in his or her possession without a permit with intent to use display and aerial consumer fireworks with a value of under five hundred dollars ($500) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall upon conviction be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense and/or imprisoned for not more than one year for each offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 110, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 134, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 177, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 406, §§ 4, 5; P.L. 1942, ch. 1130, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-13-1

; P.L. 1974, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 299, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 25, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 28, § 1.

11-13-1.1.
Repealed.

11-13-2.
Limitation of prosecutions — Fines.

No complaint for a violation of any of the provisions of §

11-13-1

shall be sustained unless it shall be brought within thirty (30) days after the commission of the offense, and all fines for such violation shall enure one-half (1/2) to the complainant and one-half (1/2) to the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 110, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 134, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 177, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 406, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

11-13-2

.

11-13-3.
Sale of fulminate cartridges or contrivances to minors.

No person shall sell to any child under the age of fifteen (15) years, without the written consent of a parent or guardian of the child, any cartridge or fixed ammunition of which any fulminate is a component part, or any gun, pistol or other mechanical contrivance arranged for the explosion of the cartridge or of any fulminate. Nothing in this section shall authorize the sale of any blank cartridge except as provided in §

11-13-5

.

Every person violating the provisions of this section shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than twenty dollars ($20.00) for each offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 110, §§ 7, 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 134, §§ 7, 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 177, §§ 7, 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 406, §§ 8, 9; G.L. 1956, §

11-13-3

.

11-13-4.
Toy canes or devices for firing blanks.

No person or persons shall sell, expose for sale, possess with intent to sell or use, or discharge or use, within this state, any repeating toy cane for discharging any explosive, any toy pistol, or any other toy device designed or used for the discharge of blank cartridges.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1244, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 134, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 177, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 406, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

11-13-4

.

11-13-5.
Sale of blanks to minors.

No person shall sell or offer to sell blank cartridges to any person under twenty-one (21) years of age.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1244, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 134, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 177, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 406, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

11-13-5

.

11-13-6.
Penalty for unlawful devices.

Any person violating any of the provisions of §

11-13-4

or

11-13-5

shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1244, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 134, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 177, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 406, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

11-13-6

.

11-13-7.
Unlawful firecrackers.

Every person who shall sell, expose for sale, possess with intent to sell, use, or explode, or use or explode any firecracker containing any explosive other than gunpowder shall be fined not more than twenty dollars ($20.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 342, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 134, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 177, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 406, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

11-13-7

.

11-13-8.
Delivery or transportation of unmarked explosives or inflammable substances.

Every person who shall knowingly deliver or cause to be delivered to any person or carrier any box, can, or other package of nitroglycerine, gunpowder, naphtha, or other equally inflammable and explosive substance, material, or fluid, not marked with a plain and legible label describing its contents, or who shall remove or cause to be removed any such label or mark, or who shall carry or cause to be carried on any vessel, car, or vehicle operated in the transportation of passengers by a common carrier, which vessel, car, or vehicle is carrying passengers for hire, any box, can, or other package of nitroglycerine, gunpowder, naphtha, guncotton or substance or material containing guncotton, or any other equally inflammable and explosive material, substance, or fluid, shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or imprisoned not more than five (5) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 47; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 50; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 50; P.L. 1926, ch. 857, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 50; G.L. 1956, §

11-13-8

.

11-13-9.
Placing of explosive devices — Threats — Possession of readily convertible components.

Every person who, without lawful authority, places a bomb, explosive device, or any destructive or incendiary device or substance, or falsely reports the placing of a bomb, explosive device, or any destructive or incendiary device or substance, shall upon conviction be imprisoned not less than three (3) years nor more than twenty (20) years and fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

Every person who threatens to place a bomb, explosive device, or any destructive or incendiary device or substance shall, upon conviction, be imprisoned not less than one year nor more than ten (10) years and fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Whoever, without lawful authority, has in their possession or under their control any bomb, explosive device, or any destructive or incendiary device or substance, or combination of materials that are readily convertible to a bomb, explosive device, or any destructive or incendiary device or substance, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than three (3) years nor more than twenty (20) years, or by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 281, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 308, art. 2, § 4.

11-13-10.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

“Destructive or incendiary device or substance” means an explosive, article or device designed or adapted to cause physical harm to persons or property by means of fire, explosion, deflagration, or detonation and consisting of any substance capable of being ignited, whether or not contrived to ignite or explode automatically.

“Explosive” means any chemical compound, mechanical mixture, or device that contains any oxidizing and combustible units, or other ingredients, in such proportions, quantities, or packing that ignition by fire, by friction, by concussion, by percussion, or by detonation of the compound, mixture, or device, or any part thereof, may cause an explosion; any chemical compound, mixture, or device, the primary or common purpose of which is to function by explosion; the term includes, but is not limited to, high and low explosives, black powder, smokeless powder, pellet powder, initiating explosives, detonators, safety fuses, squibs, detonating cord, igniter cord, igniters; and other materials that are classified as Division 1.1, 1.2, 1.3, 1.4, 1.5 or 1.6 explosives by the United States Department of Transportation or listed pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 841 or 27 C.F.R. 555.23. “Explosive” shall not include a pyrotechnic, small-arms ammunition, small-arms ammunition primers, smokeless powder and black powders possessed in quantities allowable by law pursuant to §

23-28.28-5

unless possessed or used for an illegal purpose.

“Hoax explosive,” “hoax destructive or incendiary device or substance,” or “hoax chemical, biological, or nuclear weapon” means any device, article, or substance that would cause a person to reasonably believe that the device, article, or substance is: (i) An explosive; (ii) A destructive or incendiary device or substance; or (iii) A chemical, biological, or nuclear weapon, harmful radioactive substance or poison capable of causing bodily injury that is actually an inoperable facsimile.

“Oxidizer” means a substance that yields oxygen readily to stimulate the combustion of organic matter or other fuel.

“Places” means to set or put in a particular space.

“Pyrotechnic” means any commercially manufactured combustible or explosive composition or manufactured article designed and prepared for the purpose of producing an audible effect or a visible display including, but not limited to: (i) Fireworks, firecrackers; and (ii) Flares, fuses and torpedoes, so-called, and similar signaling devices.

“Readily converted” means any combination of components that have been brought together in a manner for assembly that is designed or adapted to cause physical harm to persons or property by means of fire, explosion, deflagration, or detonation but are not yet in a completed stage. Elements to determine whether an item is “readily converted” include, but are not limited to: (i) Time required to convert the components; (ii) Ease of conversion; (iii) Expertise needed; (iv) Necessary equipment; (v) Availability of parts and the ease in which they can be obtained; (vi) Expense; (vii) Scope to which the item(s) have already been modified; and (viii) Feasibility.

“Small-arms ammunition” means any shotgun, rifle, pistol, or revolver cartridge and cartridges for propellant-actuated power devices and industrial guns.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 281, § 2.